District of Columbia statutes.
1-1162.18

Enforcement of subpoena.

The Superior Court of the District of Columbia may, upon petition by the Ethics Board, in case of refusal to obey a subpoena or order of the Ethics Board issued under § 1-1162.11(3), issue an order requiring compliance; and any failure to obey the order of the court may be treated by the court as contempt.

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 218, 59 DCR 1862